hfst/verb-som-lex.txt
LEXICON FINAL/TODO
	:+Sty/TODO			FINAL ;


! Prefixing notes
!  Marking tones because I may want to do something with them.
!  Might be nice to have an analyzer that returns forms with tones
!  for text to speech, but then strips those for other usages.

! Hmm...
!  Upon collecting forms for iqi and even just part of imi, it seems like
!  it will be annoyign to formulate something nice that isn't repetitive.
!  iqi and imi form General Past Negative in separate ways, apparently; 
!  one uses ó and the other does not.
! 
!  But maybe there is a chance for something to arise out of creating an
!  exhaustive list of forms and tags.


!!!! 	iqi - Infinitive form is aqoón
!!!!			Wáan ku aqoón doonaa 'I will recognize you.'

!  Gen Past - Note same {ŧ} / {đ} / {ñ} pattern
! 			  Note same 2/3Pl pattern

!	Sg	1		 iqiin
!		2		tiqiin
!		3m		yiqiin
!		3f		tiqiin
!	Pl	1		niqiin
!		2		tiqiinneen
!		3		yiqiinneen

! Gen Past Reduced

!	Sg	1		 iqiín
!		2		yiqiín
!		3m		yiqiín
!		3f		tiqiín
!	Pl	1		niqiín
!		2		yiqiín
!		3		yiqiín

! Gen Past Neg

!	má + 	oqoón (Sg.) / oqoonín (Pl.)
!
!   Also spelt aqoón / aqoonín
!
!
!	ex.)  Máydin oqoonín
!		 'You (pl.) did not know.'

! Gen Pres                             Gen Pres Reduced
                                      
!	Sg	1		 aqaan                	Sg	1		 aqaán
!		2		taqaan                		2		yaqaán
!		3m		yaqaan                		3m		yaqaán
!		3f		taqaan                		3f		taqaán
!	Pl	1		naqaan                	Pl	1		naqaán
!		2		taqaanniin            		2		yaqaán
!		3		yaqaanniin            		3		yaqaán

! Gen Pres (Alternate)                 Gen Pres Reduced (Alternate)
                                      
!	Sg	1		 aqaannaa             	Sg	1		 aqaanná
!		2		taqaannaa             		2		yaqaanná
!		3m		yaqaannaa             		3m		yaqaanná
!		3f		taqaannaa             		3f		taqaanná
!	Pl	1		naqaannaa             	Pl	1		naqaanná
!		2		taqaanniin            		2		yaqaanná
!		3		yaqaanniin            		3		yaqaanná

! Gen Pres Negative

!	Sg	1		 aqaán
!		2		taqaán
!		3m		yaqaán
!		3f		taqaán
!	Pl	1		naqaán
!		2		taqaanníin  ! TODO: iín?
!		3		yaqaanníin  ! TODO: iín?


! Progressive forms use the infinitive, and then essentially
! the same morphology as with suffixing verbs.

! Progressive Present              Progressive Present Reduced
                                  
!	Sg	1		aqoónayaa         	Sg	1		aqoónayá
!		2		aqoónaysaa        		2		aqoónayá
!		3m		aqoónayaa         		3m		aqoónayá
!		3f		aqoónaysaa        		3f		aqoónaysá
!	Pl	1		aqoónaynaa        	Pl	1		aqoónayná
!		2		aqoónaysaan       		2		aqoónayá
!		3		aqoónayaan        		3		aqoónayá


! Progressive Past                 Progressive Past Reduced
                                  
!	Sg	1		aqoónayay         	Sg	1		aqoónayaý
!		2		aqoónaysay        		2		aqoónayaý
!		3m		aqoónayay         		3m		aqoónayaý
!		3f		aqoónaysay        		3f		aqoónaysaý
!	Pl	1		aqoónaynay        	Pl	1		aqoónaynaý
!		2		aqoónayseen       		2		aqoónayaý
!		3		aqoónayeen        		3		aqoónayaý


! Progressive Present Negative

!	máayó + Inf ... or má + typical Prog Pres Neg endings
!		aqoonayso, aqoonayno, etc.

! 	ex.)		Má aqoónayó.		I do not recognize her.
!				Oqoón máayó.		I do not recognize her.

! Progressive Past Neg.

!  Invariable form:
!
!	Má oqoonaynín.		I didn't recognize her.

! Imperative

!		sg.			pl.
!		oqóow		oqoóda

! Negative Imperative

!		sg.			pl.
!		ha óqoon	ha oqoonína
!		ha óqoonin




!!!! 	imi - Infinitive form is imán
!!!!			Wáan ku aqoón doonaa 'I will recognize you.'

!  Gen Past - Note same {ŧ} / {đ} / {ñ} pattern
! 			  Note same 2/3Pl pattern

!	Sg	1		 imi
!		2		timi
!		3m		yimi
!		3f		timi
!	Pl	1		nimi
!		2		timaaddeen
!		3		yimaaddeen

!  Gen Past (Alternate)

!	Sg	1		 imid
!		2		timid
!		3m		yimid
!		3f		timid
!	Pl	1		nimid
!		2		timaaddeen
!		3		yimaaddeen

! Gen Past Reduced

!	Sg	1		 imí			 imíd
!		2		yimí			yimíd
!		3m		yimí			yimíd
!		3f		timí			timíd
!	Pl	1		nimí			nimíd
!		2		yimí			yimíd
!		3		yimí			yimíd

! Gen Past Neg

!	má + 	imán (Sg.) / imanín (Pl.)


! Gen Pres
                                 
!	Sg	1		 imaaddaa
!		2		timaaddaa
!		3m		yimaaddaa
!		3f		timaaddaa
!	Pl	1		nimaadnaa
!		2		timaaddaan
!		3		yimaaddaan

! Gen Pres Reduced
                                 
!	Sg	1		 imaaddá          
!		2		yimaaddá          
!		3m		yimaaddá          
!		3f		timaaddá          
!	Pl	1		nimaadná          
!		2		yimaaddá       
!		3		yimaaddá  

! Gen Pres Neg
                                 
!	Sg	1		 imaaddó         
!		2		timaaddó         
!		3m		yimaaddó         
!		3f		timaaddó         
!	Pl	1		nimaadnó         
!		2		timaaddáan      ! TODO: aán?
!		3		yimaaddáan		! TODO: aán?  


! Progressive: inf + typical progressive endings.

! TODO: collect these from Orwin anyway, p. 152




LEXICON suffixing
	V1 ;
	V2 ;
	V3 ;  
	Unknown ; 

! TODO: qaaday / qaadday / qaatay analyses. overgeneration from {d}?
!		appears not to be -t to -d next to d rule

! Note marking of voicing: arag:ar%^ak

LEXICON V2
	V2A ;
	V2B ; 


LEXICON V2A
sii		    V2A_VerbMorf "give"                          ;
geli  		V2A_VerbMorf "(talo - obj) seek advice; (ka): seek advice from someone"       ;   ! geli ~ gal- ? 
tiri	    V2A_VerbMorf "count"                         ;
xagli	    V2A_VerbMorf "tend; (u): tend towards, favor"     ;
kari		V2A_VerbMorf  "boil (tr.), cook" ;
toosi		V2A_VerbMorf "wake up (tr.)" ;
xaqiiji	    V2A_VerbMorf "confirm"                       ;
weydii	    V2A_VerbMorf "ask someone something"         ;
goy			V2A_VerbMorf "cut (tr.)" ;
hagaaji		V2A_VerbMorf "straighten (tr.), mend" ;
hay			V2A_VerbMorf "have" ;
jabi		V2A_VerbMorf "break (tr.)" ;
jooji		V2A_VerbMorf "stop (trans.)" ;
kaadi		V2A_VerbMorf "u: wait, delay" ; 
kici		V2A_VerbMorf "cause to rise, start up (tr.)" ;  ! kici ~ kac-
kordhi		V2A_VerbMorf "increase (tr.)" ; 
nadiifi		V2A_VerbMorf "clean" ;
daaji 		V2A_VerbMorf "cause to graze, graze, pasture" ; 
bi'i		V2A_VerbMorf	"destroy" ; 

! akhri		V2_VerbMorf		"read" ; ! TODO: check for V2 in corpus
bixi		V2A_VerbMorf		"cause to leave, extract; pay" ;
celi		V2A_VerbMorf		"return, ku celi - repeat" ;
day			V2A_VerbMorf		"(isku): try; look at, examine" ;
dhoofi		V2A_VerbMorf		"export" ;
diiri		V2A_VerbMorf		"heat (tr.)" ;
faraggeli	V2A_VerbMorf		"intervene" ;
fidi		V2A_VerbMorf		"expand" ;


LEXICON V2B
nabadgelyee:nabadgelye{e} 	V2B_VerbMorf	"(soo): say goodbye to"      ; 
shaqee:shaqe{e}	    		V2B_VerbMorf "work, (ka): work for someone"               ;
gelyee:gelye{e} 			V2B_VerbMorf	"(soo): say to"      ; 			! TODO: check
safee:safe{e}				V2B_VerbMorf	"clean"                      ; 
samee:same{e}				V2B_VerbMorf	"do, make, (ka): from"       ; 
garee:gare{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "do (with loanwords)" ;  !  jeeg garee 'to check', telefoongaree 'to make a phone call'
gee:ge{e}					V2B_VerbMorf "take someone/something (in the sense of a taxi)" ;
kexee:kexe{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "drive, lead (animals)" ; 
qadee:qade{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "have lunch" ; 
rajee:raje{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "hope" ; 
malee:male{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "(u): suppose" ;
cashee:cashe{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "to eat dinner" ; 
caddee:cadde{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "to make white; to make clear" ; 
casee:case{e}				V2B_VerbMorf "to make red" ; ! -ee is somewhat productive from some adjs.




LEXICON V3
	V3A ; 
	V3B ; 
	V3B_2 ;
	V3B_3 ;


LEXICON V3A
tasho:tash{o}		V3A_VerbMorf 		"consider"                        ;
tuko:tuk{o}			V3A_VerbMorf 		"pray"                            ;
joogso:joogs{o}		V3A_VerbMorf		"stop (intr.)" 					  ;

! joogso

! joogsaday		joogsannay
! joogsatay		joogsateen
! joogsaday		joogsadeen
! joogsatay

! Need to mark wado-like verbs with {d}
! TODO: why are these working without {d}?
